Washington statutes.
RCW 24.12.030

Filing articles—Property held in trust.

Articles of incorporation shall be filed in like manner as provided by law for corporations aggregate, and therein shall be set forth the facts authorizing such incorporation, and declare the manner in which any vacancy occurring in the incumbency of such bishop, overseer, or presiding elder, as the case may be, is required by the constitution, canons, rules, regulations, or discipline of such church or denomination to be filled, which statement shall be verified by affidavit, and for proof of the appointment or election of such bishop, overseer, or presiding elder, as the case may be, or any succeeding incumbent of such corporation, it shall be sufficient to file with the secretary of state the original or a copy of his or her commission, or certificate, or letters of election or appointment, duly attested: PROVIDED, All property held in such official capacity by such bishop, overseer, or presiding elder, as the case may be, shall be in trust for the use, purpose, benefit, and behoof of his or her religious denomination, society, or church.

[ 2011 c 336 s 672; 1981 c 302 s 10; 1915 c 79 s 3; RRS s 3886.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 302: See note following RCW 19.76.100.